bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abastardar/PSVWX
aboquillar/PSVWX
acañaverear/PSVWX
acantalear/PSVWX
acepillar/PSVWX
achocar/IPRSTWX
acomplejar/PRSTVWX
acribillar/PSVWX
acusar/HPRSTVWX
adocenar/PSVWX
afear/IPRSTVWX
agarbanzar/PSVWX
agradecer/IOQRTUWX
ahincar/PSVWX
aladrar/PSVWX
aldabear/PSVWX
alicatar/PSVWX
alomar/PSVWX
amadrinar/IPSVWX
amarillear/PSVWX
amilanar/IPRSTVWX
amparar/PRSTVWX
anejar/PSVWX
antorchar/PSVWX
aparecer/IORWX
aperar/PSVWX
aplicar/HPRSTUVWX
aprobar/HLPRSTWX
arenar/HPSVWX
arrasar/IPSTVWX
arrojar/PRSTVWX
asentir/ITWY
astillar/PSVWX
ataviar/PSWX
atolondrar/IPRSTVWX
atronar/IPSWX
avanzar/PRSTVWX
axiomatizar/HPSTVWX
badallar/PSVWX
bambalear/PRSTVWX
barnizar/PSVWX
batojar/PSVWX
bisbisar/PSTVWX
bolichear/PSVWX
boxear/PSVWX
bufar/PSVWX
cablegrafiar/PSWX
calaverear/PSVWX
campanear/PSVWX
capotar/PSVWX
carnear/PSVWX
catonizar/PSVWX
centuplicar/PSVWX
chancear/PSVWX
chicanear/PSVWX
choricear/PSTVWX
circular/HLMPSVWX
clorurar/PSVWX
cohibir/HOQRTWX
comer/OQRTUVWX
comprimir/OQRTVWX
condescender/LWX
conjuntar/PSVWX
constatar/HPSVWX
contradecir/OQWY
controvertir/WY
coreografiar/PSTWX
cotejar/PSTVWX
cromar/PSVWX
cuerpear/PSTVWX
damasquinar/PSVWX
defecar/HPSVWX
demeritar/PSTVWX
depravar/HPSVWX
desacerar/PSVWX
desaguar/PSWX
desalojar/IPSVWX
desaplicar/HPSVWX
desasear/PRSVWX
desavenir/WY
desbornizar/PSVWX
descalzar/PRSVWX
descarnar/PSVWX
descercar/PSVWX
descomer/VWX
descordar/PSWX
descuajeringar/PRSTVWX
desembarcar/PSVWX
desempacar/PRSVWX
desencantar/IPRSTVWX
desenfardar/PSVWX
desenlazar/PSVWX
desenterrar/IPSTWX
desestabilizar/PRSTVWX
desgajar/PRSTVWX
desguazar/PSVWX
deshipotecar/PSVWX
desintegrar/HPRSTVWX
desloar/PSVWX
desmayar/PRSVWX
desmurar/PSVWX
desopinar/PSVWX
despampanar/LPSVWX
despedazar/IPRSTVWX
despicar/PRSVWX
despolitizar/PRSTVWX
desramar/PSVWX
desternillar/LPRSVWX
desuñar/PSVWX
desviejar/PSVWX
devastar/HPSVWX
digerir/QWY
discrepar/PSVWX
disminuir/OQWYZ
doctrinar/PSTVWX
duplicar/HPRSTUVWX
electrizar/HPSVWX
embancar/PRSVWX
embellecer/IOQRTWX
emborrizar/PSTVWX
embrujar/IPSVWX
empampar/PRSVWX
empeguntar/PSVWX
empinar/IPRSTVWX
empuñar/PSTVWX
enanchar/PSVWX
encajerar/PRSVWX
encancerar/PRSVWX
encarar/IPRSTVWX
encausar/PSVWX
enchicar/PSVWX
encojar/PSVWX
encovar/PSWX
enditar/PRSVWX
enflacar/PSVWX
engallar/PRSTVWX
engollipar/PRSVWX
enguachinar/PSVWX
enjalmar/PSVWX
enlatar/PSVWX
enmarcar/PSTVWX
enramar/PSVWX
enromar/PSVWX
ensenar/PSVWX
entapizar/PSVWX
entrapar/PSVWX
entreoír/VWY
entubajar/PSVWX
envergar/PSVWX
equiparar/HPRSVWX
escacharrar/PSVWX
escapar/PRSVWX
escasear/PSVWX
escoscar/PSVWX
esforrocinar/PSVWX
espadar/PSVWX
espergurar/PSVWX
espurrear/PRSTUVWX
estandardizar/HPRSTVWX
estoquear/PRSTUVWX
estucar/PSVWX
excavar/HPRSTUVWX
expirar/HPSVWX
extralimitar/HPRSVWX
fallir/VWX
ferretear/PSTVWX
fintear/PSTVWX
forcejar/PSVWX
franquear/IPRSTVWX
fulminar/HLPRSTUVWX
garabatear/PSVWX
generar/HPRSTUVWX
gorgotear/PSVWX
graznar/PSVWX
gulusmear/PSVWX
harbullar/PSVWX
herbajear/PSVWX
hinchar/IPRSTVWX
honrar/INPRSTVWX
humar/PSVWX
imaginar/HPRSTUVWX
impregnar/HPRSTVWX
incrasar/LPSVWX
industrializar/HPSTVWX
inhibir/HOQRTVWX
insonorizar/HPSTVWX
intercomunicar/HPSVWX
invalidar/HPSTVWX
jalear/PSVWX
jijear/PSVWX
juzgar/PRSTVWX
lamiscar/PSVWX
latinizar/HPSVWX
levigar/HPSVWX
liofilizar/HPSTVWX
lombardear/PSVWX
machacar/LPRSTUVWX
malcomer/VWX
malvivir/VWX
manojear/PSVWX
marear/ILPRSTVWX
mascullar/PSTVWX
mediatizar/HPSVWX
menudear/PSVWX
mezclar/IPRSTUVWX
mirlar/IPRSVWX
moldear/IPSVWX
monumentalizar/PSTVWX
motejar/PSVWX
mundanear/PSVWX
nausear/PSVWX
normalizar/HPSTVWX
obstar/LPSVWX
olvidar/PRSTUVWX
padecer/IOQRTWX
parar/PRSTUVWX
pedir/OQWYZ
pernear/PSVWX
pintar/PRSTUVWX
pitar/PSVWX
plegar/IPRSTWX
portier/VWX
preponderar/PSVWX
prometer/ILOQRTVWX
punzar/LPSVWX
rajar/PRSTVWX
reactivar/HPRSTUVWX
reburujar/PSVWX
recluir/OQWY
recuperar/HPRSTUVWX
reflotar/PSTVWX
rehundir/VWX
remedir/HTWY
repercutir/VWX
resanar/PSVWX
resucitar/HPSTVWX
retrucar/PSVWX
rimbombar/LPSVWX
rufianear/PSVWX
salmear/PSVWX
sembrar/PSTWX
singularizar/PRSTVWX
sobrepintar/PRSVWX
sollamar/PSVWX
subastar/HPSTVWX
surcar/PSTVWX
tarazar/PSVWX
tenacear/PSVWX
tiznar/PRSTVWX
tranquear/PSVWX
trasfigurar/HPRSTVWX
tratar/ILPRSTUVWX
tronquear/PSVWX
urajear/PSVWX
vedar/IPSVWX
vislumbrar/PSTVWX
zancadillear/PSTVWX
